Vermont, session 2025-2026, H675.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 1671 is amended to read:
§ 1671. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
VT LEG #386156 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.675
2026 Page 2 of 5
(1) “Drinking water” means noncarbonated water that is intended for
human consumption or other consumer uses whether provided by a public
water system or in a container, bottle, or package, or in bulk, including water
used for production of ice, foodstuffs, or other products designed for human
consumption.
(2) “Department” means the Department of Environmental
Conservation.
(3) “Person” means any individual, partnership, company, corporation,
cooperative, association, unincorporated association, joint venture, trust, the
State of Vermont or any department, agency, subdivision, or municipality, the
U.S. government or any department, agency, or subdivision, or any other legal
or commercial entity.
(4) “Public water source” means any surface water or groundwater
supply used as a source of drinking water for a public water system.
(5)(A) “Public water system” means any system, or combination of
systems owned or controlled by a person, that provides drinking water through
pipes or other constructed conveyances to the public and that:
(i) has at least 15 service connections; or
(ii) serves an average of at least 25 individuals for at least 60 days
a year.
VT LEG #386156 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.675
2026 Page 3 of 5
(B) Public water system shall also mean means any part of a piped
system that does not provide drinking water, if use of such a part could affect
the quality or quantity of the drinking water supplied by the system. Public
water system shall also mean means a system that bottles drinking water for
public distribution and sale.
* * *
(14) “Fluoride” means a chemical compound that contains the fluoride
ion and is used to fluoridate drinking water, including:
(A) fluorosilicic acid;
(B) sodium fluorosilicate; or
(C) sodium fluoride.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1673 is amended to read:
§ 1673. PROHIBITIONS
(a) A person shall not alter, expand, or otherwise modify an existing public
water system or public water source without a permit from the Secretary.
(b) A person shall not construct a new public water system or public water
source or change an existing water system or source into a public water system
or public water source without a permit from the Secretary.
(c) A person shall not operate a public water system or public water source
without a permit from the Secretary.
VT LEG #386156 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.675
2026 Page 4 of 5
(d) As of July 1, 1993, a person shall not operate a public water system
unless the Secretary has certified the person as a public water system operator
pursuant to this chapter.
(e) A person shall not operate or maintain a public water system or public
water source in a manner that causes or allows that system or source to be at
risk of damage or contamination.
* * *
(g)(1) A person shall not add fluoride to drinking water provided by a
public water system.
(2) Notwithstanding authority to the contrary, a municipality shall not
enact an ordinance or other provision that requires or permits fluoride to be
introduced into a public water system that the municipality or a subdivision of
the municipality administers, maintains, or operates.
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 1390 is added to read:
§ 1390. FLUORIDE SUPPLEMENTATION; PROHIBITION
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Fluoride” means a chemical compound that contains the fluoride
ion and is used to fluoridate drinking water, including:
(A) fluorosilicic acid;
(B) sodium fluorosilicate; or
(C) sodium fluoride.
VT LEG #386156 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.675
2026 Page 5 of 5
(2) “School” means a public or approved independent school and
extends to school-sponsored activities and school-related programs.
(3) “School nurse” means a school nurse or associate school nurse
endorsed by the Agency of Education pursuant to the Licensing of Educators
and the Preparation of Educational Professionals rule (CVR 22-000-010) or
registered nurses licensed through the Office of Professional Regulation and
contracted to perform the duties of a school nurse.
(b)(1) A school shall not provide fluoride to a student as a supplement,
including as a tablet, liquid, or rinse.
(2) A school nurse or any other person employed by or volunteering for
the school shall not provide fluoride to a student as a medicine.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386156 v.1